District of Columbia statutes.
6-1405.04

Third party inspections.

(a)

The Mayor shall allow third party inspectors to certify the work performed pursuant to a building permit.

(b)

The Mayor shall promulgate rules to establish the minimum requirements for third party inspectors, including training and experience requirements, within 180 days of June 25, 2002.

(c)

A person, or a firm with which that person is affiliated as an owner or employee, who has performed any work for a project for which the property owner or the authorized agent has elected to use third party inspectors, including inspectors of architectural and structural plans, mechanical plans, plumbing plans, and electrical plans, shall not be eligible to serve as a third party inspector for any component on the project.

Mar. 21, 1987, D.C. Law 6-216, § 6d
as added June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-162, § 101, 49 DCR 4438
Section 301 of D.C. Law 14-162 provided: “Pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), the Mayor may issue rules to implement the provisions of this act.”